app/knowledge_base/resources/dictionary.aff
SFX V8 Y 67
SFX V8 0 xa q
SFX V8 0 xi q
SFX V8 0 xani q
SFX V8 0 xe q
SFX V8 0 xu q
SFX V8 0 sisa q
SFX V8 0 sisan q
SFX V8 0 sise q
SFX V8 0 siste q
SFX V8 0 sisna q
SFX V8 0 sistu q
SFX V8 0 sisne q
SFX V8 0 a q
SFX V8 0 achuu q
SFX V8 0 achuuf q
SFX V8 0 adha q
SFX V8 0 adhe q
SFX V8 0 adhu q
SFX V8 0 ama q
SFX V8 0 amaa q
SFX V8 0 aman q
SFX V8 0 amne q
SFX V8 0 amoo q
SFX V8 0 amta q
SFX V8 0 amtan q
SFX V8 0 amte q
SFX V8 0 amti q
SFX V8 0 amtu q
SFX V8 0 amuuf q
SFX V8 0 ani q
SFX V8 0 e q
SFX V8 0 eera q
SFX V8 0 i q
SFX V8 0 uu q
SFX V8 0 uuf q
SFX V8 0 neerra q
SFX V8 0 aaf q
SFX V8 0 aas q
SFX V8 0 aatu q
SFX V8 0 uuttan q
SFX V8 0 uutti q
SFX V8 0 aa q
SFX V8 0 naan q
SFX V8 0 u q
SFX V8 0 eeti q
SFX V8 0 ees q
SFX V8 0 is q
SFX V8 0 uufan q
SFX V8 0 uufi q
SFX V8 0 uufii q
SFX V8 0 adhuu q
SFX V8 0 adhe q
SFX V8 0 amani q
SFX V8 0 ame q
SFX V8 0 amni q
SFX V8 0 amu q
SFX V8 0 amtu q
SFX V8 0 amtani q
SFX V8 0 amuu q
SFX V8 0 amuudha q
SFX V8 0 amuudhaaf q
SFX V8 0 amuun q
SFX V8 0 ullee q
SFX V8 0 aatii q
SFX V8 0 umsa q
SFX V8 0 iisa q
SFX V8 0 iinsa q

SFX V9 Y 62
SFX V9 aaw oofte aaw
SFX V9 aaw oofti aaw
SFX V9 aaw oofna aaw
SFX V9 aaw ooftan aaw
SFX V9 aaw oofta aaw
SFX V9 aaw a aaw
SFX V9 0 a aaw
SFX V9 0 aa aaw
SFX V9 aaw achuu aaw
SFX V9 aaw achuuf aaw
SFX V9 aaw adha aaw
SFX V9 aaw adhe aaw
SFX V9 aaw adhu aaw
SFX V9 aaw ama aaw
SFX V9 aaw amaa aaw
SFX V9 aaw aman aaw
SFX V9 aaw amne aaw
SFX V9 aaw amoo aaw
SFX V9 aaw amta aaw
SFX V9 aaw amtan aaw
SFX V9 aaw amte aaw
SFX V9 aaw amti aaw
SFX V9 aaw amtu aaw
SFX V9 aaw amuuf aaw
SFX V9 aaw ani aaw
SFX V9 aaw e aaw
SFX V9 aaw eera aaw
SFX V9 aaw i aaw
SFX V9 aaw uu aaw
SFX V9 aaw uuf aaw
SFX V9 aaw neerra aaw
SFX V9 aaw aaf aaw
SFX V9 aaw aas aaw
SFX V9 aaw aatu aaw
SFX V9 aaw uuttan aaw
SFX V9 aaw uutti aaw
SFX V9 aaw aa aaw
SFX V9 aaw naan aaw
SFX V9 aaw u aaw
SFX V9 aaw eeti aaw
SFX V9 aaw ees aaw
SFX V9 aaw is aaw
SFX V9 aaw uufan aaw
SFX V9 aaw uufi aaw
SFX V9 aaw uufii aaw
SFX V9 aaw adhuu aaw
SFX V9 aaw adhe aaw
SFX V9 aaw amani aaw
SFX V9 aaw ame aaw
SFX V9 aaw amni aaw
SFX V9 aaw amu aaw
SFX V9 aaw amtu aaw
SFX V9 aaw amtani aaw
SFX V9 aaw amuu aaw
SFX V9 aaw amuudha aaw
SFX V9 aaw amuudhaaf aaw
SFX V9 aaw amuun aaw
SFX V9 aaw ullee aaw
SFX V9 aaw aatii aaw
SFX V9 aaw umsa aaw
SFX V9 aaw iisa aaw
SFX V9 aaw iinsa aaw

SFX V10 Y 59
SFX V10 0 ja j
SFX V10 0 je j
SFX V10 0 ju j
SFX V10 0 jani j
SFX V10 0 a j
SFX V10 0 achuu j
SFX V10 0 achuuf j
SFX V10 0 adha j
SFX V10 0 adhe j
SFX V10 0 adhu j
SFX V10 0 ama j
SFX V10 0 amaa j
SFX V10 0 aman j
SFX V10 0 amne j
SFX V10 0 amoo j
SFX V10 0 amta j
SFX V10 0 amtan j
SFX V10 0 amte j
SFX V10 0 amti j
SFX V10 0 amtu j
SFX V10 0 amuuf j
SFX V10 0 ani j
SFX V10 0 e j
SFX V10 0 eera j
SFX V10 0 i j
SFX V10 0 uu j
SFX V10 0 uuf j
SFX V10 0 neerra j
SFX V10 0 aaf j
SFX V10 0 aas j
SFX V10 0 aatu j
SFX V10 0 uuttan j
SFX V10 0 uutti j
SFX V10 0 aa j
SFX V10 0 naan j
SFX V10 0 u j
SFX V10 0 eeti j
SFX V10 0 ees j
SFX V10 0 is j
SFX V10 0 uufan j
SFX V10 0 uufi j
SFX V10 0 uufii j
SFX V10 0 adhuu j
SFX V10 0 adhe j
SFX V10 0 amani j
SFX V10 0 ame j
SFX V10 0 amni j
SFX V10 0 amu j
SFX V10 0 amtu j
SFX V10 0 amtani j
SFX V10 0 amuu j
SFX V10 0 amuudha j
SFX V10 0 amuudhaaf j
SFX V10 0 amuun j
SFX V10 0 ullee j
SFX V10 0 aatii j
SFX V10 0 umsa j
SFX V10 0 iisa j
SFX V10 0 iinsa j


SFX N1 Y 9
SFX N1 0 wwan aa
SFX N1 0 lee aa
SFX N1 0 n aa
SFX N1 0 tiin aa
SFX N1 0 dhaa aa
SFX N1 0 dhaaf aa
SFX N1 0 tii aa
SFX N1 0 ttii aa
SFX N1 0 rraa aa

SFX N1 Y 9
SFX N1 0 wwan ee
SFX N1 0 lee ee
SFX N1 0 n ee
SFX N1 0 tiin ee
SFX N1 0 dhaa ee
SFX N1 0 dhaaf ee
SFX N1 0 tii ee
SFX N1 0 ttii ee
SFX N1 0 rraa ee

SFX N1 Y 9
SFX N1 0 wwan ii
SFX N1 0 lee ii
SFX N1 0 n ii
SFX N1 0 tiin ii
SFX N1 0 dhaa ii
SFX N1 0 dhaaf ii
SFX N1 0 tii ii
SFX N1 0 ttii ii
SFX N1 0 rraa ii

SFX N1 Y 9
SFX N1 0 wwan oo
SFX N1 0 lee oo
SFX N1 0 n oo
SFX N1 0 tiin oo
SFX N1 0 dhaa oo
SFX N1 0 dhaaf oo
SFX N1 0 tii oo
SFX N1 0 ttii oo
SFX N1 0 rraa oo

SFX N1 Y 9
SFX N1 0 wwan uu
SFX N1 0 lee uu
SFX N1 0 n uu
SFX N1 0 tiin uu
SFX N1 0 dhaa uu
SFX N1 0 dhaaf uu
SFX N1 0 tii uu
SFX N1 0 ttii uu
SFX N1 0 rraa uu

SFX N2 Y 13 
SFX N2 a lan [aeiou'][aeiou]la 
SFX N2 a li [aeiou'][aeiou]la 
SFX N2 0 tti [aeiou'][aeiou]la 
SFX N2 0 rraa [aeiou'][aeiou]la
SFX N2 a ran [aeiou'][aeiou]ra 
SFX N2 a ri [aeiou'][aeiou]ra 
SFX N2 0 a [aeiou'][aeiou]ra 
SFX N2 0 rraa [aeiou'][aeiou]ra 
SFX N2 a man [aeiou'][aeiou]ma 
SFX N2 a mi [aeiou'][aeiou]ma 
SFX N2 a ni [aeiou'][aeiou]ma
SFX N2 a ota [aeiou'][aeiou][lmr]a 
SFX N2 a oota [aeiou'][aeiou][lmr]a 
SFX N2 a olee [aeiou'][aeiou][lmr]a 
SFX N2 a olii [aeiou'][aeiou][lmr]a

SFX N3 Y 20
SFX N3 a keen [^aeiou][aeiou]ka 
SFX N3 0 tti [^aeiou][aeiou]ka
SFX N3 0 rraa [^aeiou][aeiou]ka
SFX N3 a geen [^aeiou][aeiou]ga 
SFX N3 0 tti [^aeiou][aeiou]ga
SFX N3 0 rraa [^aeiou][aeiou]ga
SFX N3 a deen [^aeiou][aeiou]da 
SFX N3 0 tti [^aeiou][aeiou]da
SFX N3 0 rraa [^aeiou][aeiou]da
SFX N3 a reen [^aeiou][aeiou]ra 
SFX N3 0 tti [^aeiou][aeiou]ra
SFX N3 0 rraa [^aeiou][aeiou]ra
SFX N3 a been [^aeiou][aeiou]ba 
SFX N3 0 tti [^aeiou][aeiou]ba
SFX N3 0 rraa [^aeiou][aeiou]ba
SFX N3 a neen [^aeiou][aeiou]na 
SFX N3 0 tti [^aeiou][aeiou]na
SFX N3 0 rraa [^aeiou][aeiou]na
SFX N3 a ni [^aeiou][aeiou][kgdrbn]a 
SFX N3 0 a [^aeiou][aeiou][kgdrbn]a 

SFX N4 Y 26 
SFX N4 eessa eeyyii eessa 
SFX N4 a i eecha 
SFX N4 0 tti eecha 
SFX N4 0 rraa eecha 
SFX N4 a i eessa 
SFX N4 0 tti eessa 
SFX N4 0 rraa eessa 
SFX N4 a i eettii 
SFX N4 0 tti eettii 
SFX N4 0 rraa eettii 
SFX N4 a i eeysa 
SFX N4 0 tti eeysa 
SFX N4 0 rraa eeysa 
SFX N4 a i eeytii 
SFX N4 0 tti eeytii 
SFX N4 0 rraa eeytii 
SFX N4 a i essa
SFX N4 0 tti essa 
SFX N4 0 rraa essa 
SFX N4 eecha eeyyii eecha 
SFX N4 eenii eeyyii eettii 
SFX N4 eettii eeyyii eettii 

SFX N4 eeysa eeyyii eeysa 
SFX N4 eeytii eeyyii eeytii 
SFX N4 essa eeyyii essa 


SFX N5 Y 40 
SFX N5 0 ii n
SFX N5 0 iin n
SFX N5 0 iifi n
SFX N5 0 iis n
SFX N5 0 iif n
SFX N5 0 iinis n
SFX N5 0 iifuu n
SFX N5 0 iifis n
SFX N5 0 uma n
SFX N5 0 umaa n
SFX N5 0 umaanuu n
SFX N5 0 umaaf n
SFX N5 0 umaanis n
SFX N5 0 umatti n
SFX N5 0 umattuu n
SFX N5 0 umattis n
SFX N5 0 umarratti n
SFX N5 0 umarrattis n
SFX N5 0 itti n
SFX N5 0 ittis n
SFX N5 0 ittuu n
SFX N5 0 irraa n
SFX N5 0 irraahuu n
SFX N5 0 irraahis n
SFX N5 0 irraan n
SFX N5 0 irraanuu n
SFX N5 0 irraanis n
SFX N5 0 irratti n
SFX N5 0 irrattis n
SFX N5 0 irrattuu n
SFX N5 0 illee n
SFX N5 0 iinillee n
SFX N5 0 umallee n
SFX N5 0 umaafillee n
SFX N5 0 umaanillee n
SFX N5 0 ittillee n
SFX N5 0 umattillee n
SFX N5 0 irraahillee n
SFX N5 0 irrattillee n
SFX N5 0 irraanillee n


SFX N6 Y 4 
SFX N6 0 an a
SFX N6 a i a
SFX N6 0 tti a
SFX N6 a oota a
SFX N6 a bii a


SFX N7 Y 5
SFX N7 0 n a
SFX N7 0 ni a
SFX N7 aa i a
